Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 2 State Building, Plumbing, and Electrical Codes
8-2-26.1.
Definitions and requirements.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“ICC” means the International Code Council.

“Qualified inspector” means:

A person inspecting for compliance with the International Building Code or the building portion of the International Residential Code for One- and Two-Family Dwellings who holds a certification from the ICC as a building inspector;

A person inspecting for the compliance of residential buildings with the National Electrical Code or the electrical portion of the International Residential Code for One- and Two-Family Dwellings who holds a certification from the ICC as a residential electrical inspector or an electrical contractor license from the State Construction Industry Licensing Board;

A person inspecting for the compliance of nonresidential buildings with the National Electrical Code who holds a certification from the ICC as a commercial electrical inspector or an electrical contractor license from the State Construction Industry Licensing Board;

A person inspecting for compliance with the International Fuel Gas Code who holds a certification from the ICC as a mechanical inspector or plumbing inspector or a conditioned air contractor, journeyman plumber, or master plumber license from the State Construction Industry Licensing Board;

A person inspecting for compliance with the International Mechanical Code or the mechanical portion of the International Residential Code for One- and Two-Family Dwellings who holds a certification from the ICC as a mechanical inspector or a conditioned air contractor license from the State Construction Industry Licensing Board;

A person inspecting for compliance with the International Plumbing Code or the plumbing portion of the International Residential Code for One- and Two-Family Dwellings who holds a certification from the ICC as a plumbing inspector or a journeyman plumber or master plumber license from the State Construction Industry Licensing Board;

A person inspecting for compliance with any portion of the International Residential Code for One- and Two-Family Dwellings who holds a certification from the ICC as a one- and two-family dwelling inspector;

A person inspecting for compliance with the International Energy Conservation Code for Buildings who has completed eight hours of training that is conducted or approved by the department; or

“State Construction Industry Licensing Board” means that board created pursuant to Code Section 43-14-3.

The governing authority of any municipality or county which has adopted provisions for the enforcement of the state minimum standard codes shall post a notice stating whether the personnel employed by that governing authority to conduct inspections for compliance with such codes are qualified inspectors. Such notice shall separately address each minimum standard code enumerated in subdivisions (9)(A)(i)(I) through (9)(A)(i)(VIII) or (9)(B)(i)(I) through (9)(B)(i)(VIII) of Code Section 8-2-20 and the building, electrical, mechanical, and plumbing portions of the International Residential Code for One- and Two-Family Dwellings, and state whether all personnel assigned to conduct inspections for the particular code or portion of the code are qualified inspectors for that code or portion of the code.

If such notice states that not all personnel assigned to conduct inspections for a particular state minimum standard code or portion of such code are qualified inspectors for that code or portion of the code, then the governing authority may retain qualified inspectors not employed by the governing authority to conduct inspections. If the governing authority does not so retain qualified inspectors, then any person, firm, or corporation engaged in a construction project which requires inspection shall have the option of retaining, at its own expense, a person who is a qualified inspector for that code or portion of the code and who is not an employee of or otherwise affiliated with or financially interested in such person, firm, or corporation to provide the required inspection.

The person, firm, or corporation retaining a qualified inspector to conduct an inspection pursuant to this Code section shall be required to pay to the county or municipality which requires the inspection the same permit fees and charges which would have been required had the inspection been conducted by a county or municipal inspector.

A qualified inspector retained pursuant to this Code section shall be empowered to perform any inspection required by the governing authority of any county or municipality, including but not limited to inspections for footings, foundations, concrete slabs, framing, electrical, plumbing, heating ventilation and air conditioning (HVAC), or any and all other inspections necessary or required for the issuance of a certificate of occupancy by the governing authority of any county or municipality; provided, however, that the qualified inspector must possess the qualifications described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section for the particular type of inspection. Any inspection conducted pursuant to this Code section shall be no less extensive than an inspection conducted by a county or municipal inspector.

Upon submission by the qualified inspector of a copy of his or her inspection report to the local governing authority, said local governing authority shall be required to accept the inspection of the qualified inspector without the necessity of further inspection or approval by the inspectors or other personnel employed by the local governing authority unless said governing authority has notified the qualified inspector, within two business days after the submission of the inspection report, that it finds the report incomplete or the inspection inadequate and has provided the qualified inspector with a written description of the deficiencies and specific code requirements that have not been adequately addressed.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to apply to inspections for compliance with a state or local fire safety standard or erosion control standard.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to limit any public or private right of action designed to provide protection, rights, or remedies for consumers.

A person inspecting for compliance with any of the codes listed in subparagraphs (A) through (H) of this paragraph who holds:

A certificate of registration as a professional engineer issued under Chapter 15 of Title 43 and is practicing within the scope of his or her branch of engineering expertise while conducting such inspection;

A level II, III, IV, or V certification from the Building Officials Association of Georgia, provided that such levels of certification require work experience and an examination by the ICC or a testing agency approved by the Building Officials Association of Georgia; or

A level II, III, IV, or V certification from the Building Officials Association of Georgia on July 1, 2015.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-26.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 452, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 551, § 7; Ga. L. 2015, p. 941, § 1/HB 341; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 8/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “one- and two-family dwelling” for “one and two-family dwelling” in subparagraph (a)(2)(G).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “means the International Code Council” was substituted for “means International Code Council” in paragraph (a)(1); “compliance with any portion” was substituted for “compliance any portion” in subparagraph (a)(2)(G); and “(9)(A)(i)(VIII) or (9)(B)(i)(I)” was substituted for “(9)(A)(i)(VIII) (9)(B)(i)(I)” in subsection (b).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, “July 1, 2015” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section” in division (a)(2)(I)(iii).

8-2-27.
Conformance of buildings to energy conservation code; applicability to exempted and renovated buildings; appeals.

The design, erection, construction, and alteration of any building to which the International Energy Conservation Code shall apply shall be accomplished so that the building or applicable portions thereof shall meet or conform to such code.

Enforcement of compliance with this Code section shall be solely the province of local governing authorities, except in regard to buildings owned by the state. In state owned buildings, the state agency which owns the building shall provide for the compliance with the code adopted under this part. Local governing authorities are authorized to adopt rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of the code and to adopt such penalties for violation of the code as they deem appropriate. Local governing authorities are authorized to exercise all the powers enumerated in subsection (a) of Code Section 8-2-26 in enforcement of the International Energy Conservation Code.

The International Energy Conservation Code shall not apply to exempted buildings; and, with respect to renovated buildings, such code shall apply only to portions or systems of the building which are directly involved in the renovation.

The commissioner or his or her designated representative shall have authority to hear appeals relating to the interpretation, enforcement, and administration by local governing authorities of the International Energy Conservation Code and exceptions to such code. The commissioner may, at his or her option, hear de novo cases but shall not hear any appeal until it is determined that the appeal procedures available through the affected local government have been exhausted. If, on appeal, the commissioner determines that the local governing authority erred in its interpretation of the code, he or she shall remand the case to the local government with instructions to take such action as he or she directs. Further appeals may be made as provided by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 2212, §§ 4, 6, 7; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 8; Ga. L. 2004, p. 551, § 8.

Cross references.

Solar easements, §

44-9-20

et seq.

8-2-28.
Adoption by municipality or county enforcing construction code of state minimum standard code.

Any municipality or county either enforcing or adopting and enforcing a construction code shall utilize one or more of the state minimum standard codes established pursuant to this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 546, § 7; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 9; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1659, § 9; Ga. L. 2004, p. 551, § 8.

8-2-29.
Powers of department generally.

In addition to any other powers granted by this part, the department shall have the power to:

Administer all funds available under this part;

Accept any grant of funds made by the United States government or any agency thereof for the purpose of carrying out this part;

Request from the various departments, agencies, and authorities of the state and its political subdivisions such available information as it may require in its work; and all such departments, agencies, and authorities shall furnish, within a reasonable time, such requested available information to the department;

Contract with the United States government or agencies thereof, with political subdivisions of the state, and with private persons and corporations; and

Do all other things necessary and proper to exercise its powers and perform its duties in accordance with this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 546, § 8; Ga. L. 1970, p. 734, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 8.

8-2-30.
Scope of applicability of part generally.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, this part shall apply to all installations, alterations, and repairs of plumbing, air-conditioning and heating, or electrical systems within or on public or private buildings, structures, or premises.

This part shall not apply to the installation, alteration, or repair of plumbing, air-conditioning and heating, or electrical systems up to and including the meters, where such work is performed by or is an integral part of the system owned or operated by a public service corporation or by the water or gas department of any city in this state in rendering its duly authorized service as such.

This part shall not apply to the installation, alteration, or repair of plumbing, air-conditioning and heating, or electrical systems where such work is an integral part of the system owned or operated, in rendering its duly authorized service as such, by a railroad company, a pipeline company, a mining company, or a public utility in the exercise of its normal functions as a public utility, or where such work is an integral part of any irrigation system on farms, ranches, or other open, unpopulated areas where such work will not be located within 30 feet of any dwelling or any building devoted to animal husbandry.

This part shall not prohibit an individual from installing, altering, or repairing plumbing systems and fixtures, air-conditioning and heating systems and fixtures, or electrical systems in a single-family dwelling owned and occupied by him or her, provided that all such work must be done in conformity with all other provisions of this part and the orders, rules, and regulations of the department.

This part shall not prohibit an individual from installing, altering, or repairing plumbing systems and fixtures, air-conditioning and heating systems and fixtures, or electrical systems in a farm or ranch building owned or occupied by him or her, provided that all such work must be done in conformity with all other provisions of this part and the orders, rules, and regulations of the department.

This Code section shall not affect or abrogate the requirements of the International Energy Conservation Code.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 546, § 10; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 11; Ga. L. 2004, p. 551, § 9.

8-2-31.
Effect of part.

Nothing in this part shall repeal or be construed as abrogating or otherwise affecting the power of any state department or agency to promulgate regulations, make inspections, or approve plans in accordance with any other applicable provisions of law.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as repealing or otherwise affecting authorization for historic preservation districts established pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 10 of Title 44, the “Georgia Historic Preservation Act.”

Nothing in this part shall be construed as repealing or otherwise affecting:

Part 6 of this article, relating to elevators, dumbwaiters, escalators, manlifts, and moving walks;

Article 2 of Chapter 15 of Title 25, the “Boiler Vessel Safety Act”;

Chapter 3 of Title 30, relating to access to and use of public facilities by physically disabled persons; or

The Georgia State Fire Code as adopted by the Safety Fire Commissioner pursuant to Code Section 25-2-13.

Standards for the construction of manufactured homes covered under Part 2 of Article 2 of this chapter shall be governed by the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, as amended, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq., and nothing in this part is intended to permit the adoption of any other standards for or local regulation of the construction of manufactured homes.

Standards relative to liquefied petroleum gas shall be governed by Article 10 of Chapter 1 of Title 10 and no provision of this part shall be construed to permit the adoption of standards, rules, or regulations relative to liquefied petroleum gas by the Department of Community Affairs or the adoption by local governments of regulations or ordinances relative to liquefied petroleum gas in conflict with Article 10 of Chapter 1 of Title 10.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 546, § 5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 10; Ga. L. 1981, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1659, § 10; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2134, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 8; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 14; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 9/SB 446.